Utah statutes.
4-15-7.   Inspection -- Issuance of certificate -- Destruction of infested or diseased stock.

(1)  Each nursery shall be inspected by the department at least once each year. If upon inspection it appears that the nursery and its stock are free of insect pests and plant disease the department shall issue a certificate to that effect to the nursery.

(2)  Each nursery outlet shall be inspected by the department at least once each year during the period nursery stock is offered for retail sale. An inspection certificate may be issued by the department to a nursery outlet to permit the interstate shipment of nursery stock if the stock contemplated for shipment appears free of insect pests and plant disease.

(3)  Nursery stock found to be infested with insect pests or infected with plant disease shall be destroyed or otherwise treated as determined by the department.

